Hawaii, session 2025, GM1191.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that numerous private
organizations have attempted to amend existing law to enable
special number plates with full-plate designs to raise revenue
for their causes. While successful in some cases, the
legislature also finds that the county agencies responsible for
issuing license plates bear significant burden contracting to
produce new license plates each time a new license plate law is
adopted. In addition, creating a full-plate design requires
acquiring non-standard specialized license plates, which can
cause complications with procurement and cost.
The legislature further finds that existing law allows
private organizations to apply for and have license plate
designs based on decals added to standard license plates limited
to three inches wide by three inches high, which can raise
revenue for their causes, without having to change the law, or
add burden to the counties.
2025-2865 SB1095 CDl SMA.docx 1

Page 2
S.B. NO. sT,
H.D. 1
CD. 1
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to reduce the
burden on organizations attempting to amend special number plate
statutes and the counties attempting to implement special number
plate requirements by expanding the existing decal size
S restrictions.
SECTION 2. Section 249-9.3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) In lieu of the number plates contracted on behalf of
the counties by the director of finance of the city and county
of Honolulu, the county directors of finance shall issue special
number plates to any organization in the State that meets the
minimum standards and qualifications established under this
section. Organizations are authorized to retain the fees
collected, less expenses, for the special number plates.
The director of finance of the city and county of Honolulu,
in consultation with the directors of finance of the counties of
Kauai, Maui, and Hawaii, shall establish special design
parameters and restrictions for decals or graphic
representations affixable to special number plates; provided
that the decal shall not be larger than [three] four inches wide
by [-fehr^ee] four inches high."
2025-2865 SB1095 CDl SMA.docx

Page 3 S.B. NO. JS*,
H.D. 1
CD. 1
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2865 SB1095 CDl SMA.docx 3

S.B. NO. g;
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 27th day of May . 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1

S.B. No. 1095, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I
Date; April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
President of the Sehafe
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 1095, SD 1,HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives